Utah statutes.
53A-15-1209.   Online course credit hours included in daily membership -- Limitation.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a student's primary LEA of enrollment shall include online course credit hours in calculating daily membership.

(2)  A student may not count as more than one FTE, unless the student intends to complete high school graduation requirements, and exit high school, early, in accordance with the student's education/occupation plan (SEOP).

(3)  A student who enrolls in an online course may not be counted in membership for a released-time class, if counting the student in membership for a released-time class would result in the student being counted as more than one FTE.

(4)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), a student enrolled in an online course may earn no more credits in a year than the number of credits a student may earn in a year by taking a full course load during the regular school day in the student's primary LEA of enrollment.

(5)  A student enrolled in an online course may earn more credits in a year than the number of credits a student may earn in a year by taking a full course load during the regular school day in the student's primary LEA of enrollment:

(a)  if the student intends to complete high school graduation requirements, and exit high school, early, in accordance with the student's education/occupation plan (SEOP); or

(b)  if allowed under local school board or charter school governing board policy.



Amended by Chapter 238, 2012 General Session

